Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Compensation" means money, property, or anything else of value.

(2) "Immigration matter" means any proceeding, filing, or action affecting the nonimmigrant, immigrant, or citizenship status of any person arising under immigration and naturalization law, executive order, or presidential proclamation, or pursuant to any action of the United States citizenship and immigration services, the United States department of labor, the United States department of state, the United States department of justice, the United States department of homeland security, the board of immigration appeals, or any other entity or agency having jurisdiction over immigration law.

(3) "Practice of law" has the definition given to it by the supreme court of Washington whether by rule or decision, and includes all exceptions and exclusions to that definition currently in place or hereafter created, whether by rule or decision.

[ 2011 c 244 s 2; 1989 c 117 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.